District of Columbia statutes.
42-3602

Action for possession of rental unit used as a drug haven.

(a)

Notwithstanding any provision of § 16-1501, or § 42-3505.01, a housing provider may commence an action in the Court to recover possession of a rental unit or the Mayor may commence an action in the Court to evict a tenant or occupant in a rental unit. The following persons may commence an action to abate a nuisance in the Court: the Mayor, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, the civic association within whose boundaries the nuisance is located, or the community association within whose boundaries the nuisance is located. The recovery or eviction shall be ordered if the Court has determined, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the rental unit is a drug haven or that a nuisance exists. In making the determination that the rental unit is a drug haven or that a nuisance exists, the Court shall consider:

(1)

Whether a tenant or occupant of the rental unit has been charged with a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or the Controlled Substances Act due to activities that occurred within the housing accommodation that contains the rental unit, or has violated a term of parole or probation for a previous conviction under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or the Controlled Substances Act;

(2)

Whether the rental unit has been the subject of more than one drug-related search or seizure that has resulted in the arrest of a tenant or occupant;

(3)

Whether a firearm has been discharged within the rental unit;

(4)

The testimony of a witness concerning the possession, manufacture, storage, distribution, use, or the attempted possession, manufacture, storage, distribution, or use of an illegal drug by a tenant or occupant in the housing accommodation that contains the rental unit;

(5)

The general reputation of the property to corroborate testimony based on personal knowledge or observation, or evidence seized during the execution of a search and seizure warrant; provided, that this shall not, in and of itself, be sufficient to establish the existence of a drug haven or nuisance;

(6)

Evidence that the drug haven or nuisance had been discontinued at the time of the filing of the complaint or at the time of the hearing, which evidence will not bar the granting of appropriate relief by the Court; or

(7)

Any other relevant and admissible evidence that demonstrates that the rental unit is or is not a drug haven or nuisance.

(b)

A notice of the action shall be served upon the tenant or occupant and housing provider at least 5 days prior to a hearing.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1303, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1303 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1303 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
This section is referenced in § 42-3603, § 42-3604, and § 42-3606.